Maryland, session 2026, SB0866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 21–330.3 and 21–330.4 of Article – Health – General of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 21–330.4 and 21–330.5, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) (i) “Facility” means an agency, an association, a corporation, a firm,
a partnership, or any other entity.
(ii) “Facility” does not include a grocery store or restaurant that is
subject to [§ 21–330.3] § 21–330.4 of the Health – General Article.
Article – Health – General
21–301.

SENATE BILL 866 3
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (1) “Food service facility” means:
(i) A place where food or drink is prepared for sale or service on the
premises or elsewhere; or
(ii) Any operation where food is served to or provided for the public,
with or without charge.
(2) “Food service facility” includes a micro market licensed under Title 17,
Subtitle 17 of the Business Regulation Article.
(3) “Food service facility” does not include:
(i) A kitchen in a private home where food is prepared at no charge
for guests in the home, for guests at a social gathering, or for service to unemployed,
homeless, or other disadvantaged populations;
(ii) A food preparation or serving area where food is prepared or
served only by an excluded organization;
(iii) A location in a farmer’s market or at a public festival or event
where raw agricultural products, as defined in § 21–304(d)(1)(iii) of this subtitle, are sold;
or
(iv) A cottage food business.
21–330.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHAIN RESTAURANT” MEANS A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY THAT IS:
(I) IS PART OF A CHAIN WITH 20 OR MORE LOCATIONS DOING
BUSINESS UNDER THE SAME NAME, REGARDLESS OF OWNERSHIP STRUCTURE, AND
OFFERING FOR SALE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR MENU ITEMS; AND
(II) IS SUBJECT TO FEDERAL LABELING REQUIREMENTS UNDER
21 U.S.C. § 343(Q)(5)(H).
(3) “HIGH ADDED SUGARS CONTENT” MEANS 25 MILLIGRAMS GRAMS
OR MORE OF ADDED SUGARS PER SERVING.

SENATE BILL 866
(4) “HIGH SODIUM CONTENT” MEANS 1,150 MILLIGRAMS OR MORE OF
SODIUM PER SERVING.
(5) “MENU” OR “MENU BOARD” MEANS THE PRIMARY WRITING
SOURCE FROM WHICH A CUSTOMER MAKES AN ORDER SELECTION.
(6) “POINT OF SELECTION” MEANS A PLACE WHERE A CUSTOMER MAY
VIEW THE MENU AND MAKE A SELECTION TO PURCHASE A MENU ITEM.
(7) (6) (I) “STANDARD MENU ITEM” MEANS A FOOD OR
BEVERAGE ITEM THAT IS LISTED ON A MENU OR MENU BOARD.
(II) “STANDARD MENU ITEM” DOES NOT INCLUDE A FOOD OR
BEVERAGE ITEM THAT APPEARS ON A MENU OR MENU BOARD FOR LESS THAN 60
CALENDAR DAYS PER YEAR.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO:
(1) ESTABLISH A HIGH SODIUM CONTENT WARNING ICON AND
ACCOMPANYING TEXT;
(2) ESTABLISH A HIGH ADDED SUGARS CONTENT WARNING ICON AND
ACCOMPANYING TEXT;
(3) ESTABLISH A MINIMUM SIZE FOR EACH WARNING ICON THAT IS AT
LEAST AS LARGE AS THE LARGEST TEXT CHARACTER USED IN THE NAME OF THE
MENU ITEM THAT THE ICON WILL BE DISPLAYED NEXT TO ON THE MENU OR MENU
BOARD; AND
(4) IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(C) CONCURRENT WITH THE ADOPTION OF REGULATIONS UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH GUIDANCE
ON ITS WEBSITE THAT DETAILS THE PURPOSE OF AND HOW A CHAIN RESTAURANT
MAY COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(D) DURING CALENDAR YEAR 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER
A CONTINUING EDUCATION CAMPAIGN THAT EXPLAINS DIRECT CHAIN
RESTAURANTS TO ITS WEBSITE FOR THE PURPOSE OF EXPLAINING THE PURPOSE OF
AND HOW A CHAIN RESTAURANT MAY COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.

SENATE BILL 866 5
(E) (C) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028 2027, EACH CHAIN RESTAURANT IN
THE STATE SHALL DISPLAY ON EACH MENU OR MENU BOARD A WRITTEN
DISCLOSURE AND NOTICE TO CUSTOMERS THAT:
(1) NEXT TO EACH STANDARD MENU ITEM WITH A HIGH SODIUM
CONTENT, THE HIGH SODIUM CONTENT WARNING ICON AND ACCOMPANYING TEXT
ESTABLISHED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
STANDARD MENU ITEMS MAY CONTAIN HIGH SODIUM OR HIGH SUGAR; AND
(2) NEXT TO EACH STANDARD MENU ITEM WITH A HIGH ADDED
SUGARS CONTENT, THE HIGH ADDED SUGARS CONTENT WARNING ICON AND
ACCOMPANYING TEXT ESTABLISHED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FULL NUTRITIONAL INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE
THROUGH A QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODE, ONLINE, OR BY REQUEST.
(D) A CHAIN RESTAURANT MAY COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION BY MAKING THE FULL NUTRITIONAL INFORMATION OF THE FOOD OR
BEVERAGE ITEM AVAILABLE:
(1) THROUGH USE OF A QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODE THAT LINKS TO
THE CHAIN RESTAURANT’S ONLINE NUTRITIONAL INFORMATION; AND
(2) ON REQUEST OF A CUSTOMER, IN ANY PRINTED FORMAT.
(F) (1) IF THE CHAIN RESTAURANT IS REQUIRED TO DISPLAY A WARNING
ICON AND ACCOMPANYING TEXT UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE
FOLLOWING TEXT SHALL BE PROMINENTLY, CLEARLY, AND CONSPICUOUSLY
DISPLAYED AT THE POINT OF SELECTION LEAST ONCE ON EACH MENU OR MENU
BOARD:
“THE HIGH SODIUM CONTENT WARNING ICON INDICATES A MENU ITEM WITH
A SODIUM (SALT) CONTENT THAT EXCEEDS HALF THE TOTAL DAILY RECOMMENDED
LIMIT. DIETS HIGHER IN SODIUM ARE ASSOCIATED WITH AN INCREASED RISK OF
DEVELOPING HIGH BLOOD PRESSURE, WHICH IS A MAJOR CAUSE OF HEART DISEASE
AND STROKE.”.
(2) IF THE CHAIN RESTAURANT IS REQUIRED TO DISPLAY A WARNING
ICON AND ACCOMPANYING TEXT UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE
FOLLOWING TEXT SHALL BE PROMINENTLY, CLEARLY, AND CONSPICUOUSLY
DISPLAYED AT THE POINT OF SELECTION LEAST ONCE ON EACH MENU OR MENU
BOARD:

SENATE BILL 866
“THE HIGH ADDED SUGARS CONTENT WARNING ICON INDICATES A MENU ITEM
WITH A SUGAR CONTENT THAT EXCEEDS HALF THE TOTAL DAILY RECOMMENDED
LIMIT. DIETS WITH HIGHER AMOUNTS OF ADDED SUGARS OVER TIME MAY INCREASE
THE RISK OF TYPE 2 DIABETES, WEIGHT GAIN, AND TOOTH DECAY.”.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2032, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT:
(1) REVIEWS ANY EVIDENCE OF THE IMPACT OF THE REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) WHETHER AND TO WHAT EXTENT ANY STANDARD MENU
ITEMS WERE REFORMULATED; AND
(II) WHETHER AND HOW CONSUMER BEHAVIOR CHANGED; AND
(2) RECOMMENDS ANY ADDITIONAL NUTRITION–RELATED MENU
WARNING ICONS THAT SHOULD BE CONSIDERED.
21–1214.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 3 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 3 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to:
(i) For a first offense, a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment
not exceeding 90 days, or both; and
(ii) For a second offense, a fine not exceeding $2,500 or imprisonment
not exceeding 1 year, or both.
(2) A person who violates § 21–330.1 OR § 21–330.3 of this title is not
subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 3 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 3 of this title or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 3 of this title:
(1) Is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, to be collected in a civil
action in the District Court for any county; and
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.

SENATE BILL 866 7
(c) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.